API/spylls/examples/si_LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 234 Y 131
SFX 234 0 දෙන .
SFX 234 0 දෙනා .
SFX 234 0 දෙවෙන .
SFX 234 0 දෙවෙනා .
SFX 234 0 දුන් .
SFX 234 0 දුන්න .
SFX 234 0 දීපු .
SFX 234 0 දී .
SFX 234 0 දීලා .
SFX 234 0 දෙමින් .
SFX 234 0 දෙත්ම .
SFX 234 0 දෙන්න .
SFX 234 0 දෙන්නට .
SFX 234 0 දිය .
SFX 234 0 දෙද්දී .
SFX 234 0 දෙ‍තොත් .
SFX 234 0 දුන්නොත් .
SFX 234 0 දුන්නොතින් .
SFX 234 0 දෙතත් .
SFX 234 0 දුන්නත් .
SFX 234 0 දුන්හ .
SFX 234 0 දෙනවා .
SFX 234 0 දෙමි .
SFX 234 0 දෙන්නෙමි .
SFX 234 0 දෙමු .
SFX 234 0 දෙන්නෙමු .
SFX 234 0 දෙහි .
SFX 234 0 දෙන්නෙහි .
SFX 234 0 දෙහු .
SFX 234 0 දෙන්නෙහු .
SFX 234 0 දෙන්නේය .
SFX 234 0 දෙන්නීය .
SFX 234 0 දෙන්නාය .
SFX 234 0 දෙති .
SFX 234 0 දෙන්නෝය .
SFX 234 0 දෙන්න .
SFX 234 0 දෙව .
SFX 234 0 දෙනු .
SFX 234 0 දෙපිය .
SFX 234 0 දොපිය .
SFX 234 0 දෙපන් .
SFX 234 0 දොපන් .
SFX 234 0 දෙව් .
SFX 234 0 දෙපියව් .
SFX 234 0 දොපියව් .
SFX 234 0 දෙපල්ලා .
SFX 234 0 දොපල්ලා .
SFX 234 0 දෙනවාලා .
SFX 234 0 දෙයිලු .
SFX 234 0 දෙන්නේලු .
SFX 234 0 දෙතිලු .
SFX 234 0 දෙන්නෝලු .
SFX 234 0 දෙද්දෙන් .
SFX 234 0 දෙපුවාවේ .
SFX 234 0 දොපුවාවේ .
SFX 234 0 දෙපුදෙන් .
SFX 234 0 දොපුදෙන් .
SFX 234 0 දොවි .
SFX 234 0 දේවි .
SFX 234 0 දෙවනවා .
SFX 234 0 දෙවමි .
SFX 234 0 දෙවන්නෙමි .
SFX 234 0 දෙවමු .
SFX 234 0 දෙවන්නෙමු .
SFX 234 0 දෙවහි .
SFX 234 0 දෙවන්නෙහි .
SFX 234 0 දෙවහු .
SFX 234 0 දෙවන්නෙහු .
SFX 234 0 දෙවන්නේය .
SFX 234 0 දෙවන්නීය .
SFX 234 0 දෙවන්නාය .
SFX 234 0 දෙවති .
SFX 234 0 දෙවන්නෝය .
SFX 234 0 දෙවන්න .
SFX 234 0 දෙවව .
SFX 234 0 දෙවනු .
SFX 234 0 දෙවපිය .
SFX 234 0 දෙවාපිය .
SFX 234 0 දෙවපන් .
SFX 234 0 දෙවාපන් .
SFX 234 0 දෙවව් .
SFX 234 0 දෙවපියව් .
SFX 234 0 දෙවාපියව් .
SFX 234 0 දෙවපල්ලා .
SFX 234 0 දෙවාපල්ලා .
SFX 234 0 දෙවනවාලා .
SFX 234 0 දෙවයිලු .
SFX 234 0 දෙවන්නේලු .
SFX 234 0 දෙවතිලු .
SFX 234 0 දෙවන්නෝලු .
SFX 234 0 දෙවද්දෙවන් .
SFX 234 0 දෙවපුවාවේ .
SFX 234 0 දෙවාපුවාවේ .
SFX 234 0 දෙවපුදෙවන් .
SFX 234 0 දෙවාපුදෙවන් .
SFX 234 0 දෙවාවි .
SFX 234 0 දෙවේවි .
SFX 234 0 දුන්නා  .
SFX 234 0 දුන්නෙමි  .
SFX 234 0 දුන්නෙමු  . 
SFX 234 0 දුන්නෙහි  .
SFX 234 0 දුන්නෙහු  . 
SFX 234 0 දුන්නේය  .
SFX 234 0 දුන්නාය  .
SFX 234 0 දුන්නහ  .
SFX 234 0 දුන්නෝය  .
SFX 234 0 දුන්නාලු  .
SFX 234 0 දුන්නේලු  .
SFX 234 0 දුන්නහලු  .
SFX 234 0 දුන්නෝලු  .
SFX 234 0 දුන්නාවේ  .
SFX 234 0 දුන්නදෙන්  .
SFX 234 0 දුන්නාදෙන්  .
SFX 234 0 දුන්නපුදෙන්  . 
SFX 234 0 දෙව්වා .
SFX 234 0 දෙව්වෙමි .
SFX 234 0 දෙව්වෙමු .
SFX 234 0 දෙව්වෙහි .
SFX 234 0 දෙව්වෙහු .
SFX 234 0 දෙව්වේය .
SFX 234 0 දෙව්වාය .
SFX 234 0 දෙව්හ .
SFX 234 0 දෙව්වහ .
SFX 234 0 දෙව්වෝය .
SFX 234 0 දෙව්වාලු .
SFX 234 0 දෙව්වේලු .
SFX 234 0 දෙව්හලු .
SFX 234 0 දෙව්වහලු .
SFX 234 0 දෙව්වෝලු .
SFX 234 0 දෙව්වාවේ .
SFX 234 0 දෙව්වදෙන් .

SFX 235 Y 16
SFX 235 0 මි  . 
SFX 235 0 මු  .
SFX 235 0 හි  .
SFX 235 0 හු  .
SFX 235 0 ති  . 
SFX 235 0 ව  .
SFX 235 0 පිය  .
SFX 235 0 පන්  .
SFX 235 0 ව්  . 
SFX 235 0 පියව්  .
SFX 235 0 පල්ලා  .
SFX 235 0 යිලු  .
SFX 235 0 තිලු  . 
SFX 235 0 පුවාවේ  .
SFX 235 0 පුදෙන්  .
SFX 235 0 ගේවි  .

SFX 236 Y 72
SFX 236 0   . 
SFX 236 0 ා  .
SFX 236 0 ාව  .
SFX 236 0 ාපු  . 
SFX 236 0 ාපිය  .
SFX 236 0 ාපන්  . 
SFX 236 0 ාපල්ලා  .
SFX 236 0 ාපුවාවේ  . 
SFX 236 0 ාපුදෙන්  .
SFX 236 0 ාවා .
SFX 236 0 ාවෙමි .
SFX 236 0 ාවෙමු .
SFX 236 0 ාවෙහි .
SFX 236 0 ාවෙහු .
SFX 236 0 ාවේය .
SFX 236 0 ාවාය .
SFX 236 0 ාහ .
SFX 236 0 ාවහ .
SFX 236 0 ාවෝය .
SFX 236 0 ාවාලු .
SFX 236 0 ාවේලු .
SFX 236 0 ාහලු .
SFX 236 0 ාවහලු .
SFX 236 0 ාවෝලු .
SFX 236 0 ාවාවේ .
SFX 236 0 ාවදෙන් .
SFX 236 0 ත්  . 
SFX 236 0 ල්ලා  .
SFX 236 0 ොපියව්  . 
SFX 236 0 ේවි   . 
SFX 236 0 ්නා  .
SFX 236 0 ්වන  . 
SFX 236 0 ්වනා  .
SFX 236 0 ්වපු  . 
SFX 236 0 ්වා  .
SFX 236 0 ්වත්ම  .
SFX 236 0 ්නන .
SFX 236 0 ්වන්න  .
SFX 236 0 ්වන්නට  .
SFX 236 0 ්වත්දී  . 
SFX 236 0 ්වතොත්  .
SFX 236 0 ්වතත්  .
SFX 236 0 ෙනවා  . 
SFX 236 0 ෙමි  .
SFX 236 0 ෙන්නෙමි  . 
SFX 236 0 ෙමු  .
SFX 236 0 ෙන්නෙමු  . 
SFX 236 0 ෙහි  .
SFX 236 0 ෙන්නෙහි  . 
SFX 236 0 ෙහු  .
SFX 236 0 ෙන්නෙහු  . 
SFX 236 0 ෙන්නේය  .
SFX 236 0 ෙන්නීය  . 
SFX 236 0 ෙන්නාය  .
SFX 236 0 ෙති  . 
SFX 236 0 ෙන්නෝය  .
SFX 236 0 ෙන්න  . 
SFX 236 0 ෙව  .
SFX 236 0 ෙනු  .
SFX 236 0 ෙපිය  . 
SFX 236 0 ෙපන්  .
SFX 236 0 ෙව්  . 
SFX 236 0 ෙපියව්  .
SFX 236 0 ෙපල්ලා  . 
SFX 236 0 ෙනවාලා  .
SFX 236 0 ෙයිලු  . 
SFX 236 0 ෙන්නේලු  .
SFX 236 0 ෙතිලු  . 
SFX 236 0 ෙන්නෝලු  .
SFX 236 0 ෙද්දෙන්  . 
SFX 236 0 ෙපුවාවේ  .
SFX 236 0 ෙපුදෙන්  .

SFX 237 Y 17
SFX 237 0   . 
SFX 237 0 වා  . 
SFX 237 0 ්නෙමි  .
SFX 237 0 ්නෙමු  . 
SFX 237 0 ්නෙහි  .
SFX 237 0 ්නෙහු  .
SFX 237 0 ්නේය  . 
SFX 237 0 ්නීය  .
SFX 237 0 ්නාය  .
SFX 237 0 ්නෝය  . 
SFX 237 0 ්න  .
SFX 237 0 ු  .
SFX 237 0 වාලා  . 
SFX 237 0 ්නේලු  .
SFX 237 0 ්නෝලු .
SFX 237 0 ්නේ  .
SFX 237 0 ්නට  .

SFX 238 Y 11
SFX 238 0   . 
SFX 238 0 ා  . 
SFX 238 0 වා  .
SFX 238 0 ෙමි  . 
SFX 238 0 ෙමු  . 
SFX 238 0 ෙහි  .
SFX 238 0 ෙහු  .
SFX 238 0 ේය  . 
SFX 238 0 ීය  . 
SFX 238 0 ාය  . 
SFX 238 0 ේාය  . 

SFX 239 Y 6
SFX 239 0 ි ී  . 
SFX 239 0 මි  . 
SFX 239 0 මු  .
SFX 239 0 හ  . 
SFX 239 0 යි  . 
SFX 239 0 ති  .

PFX 240 Y 1
PFX 240 0 නො .

SFX 241 Y 17 
SFX 241 0 ෑවා  .
SFX 241 0 ෑවෙමි  .
SFX 241 0 ෑවෙමු  . 
SFX 241 0 ෑවෙහි  .
SFX 241 0 ෑවෙහු  . 
SFX 241 0 ෑවේය  .
SFX 241 0 ෑවාය  .
SFX 241 0 ෑවහ  .
SFX 241 0 ෑවෝය  .
SFX 241 0 ෑවාලු  .
SFX 241 0 ෑවේලු  .
SFX 241 0 ෑවහලු  .
SFX 241 0 ෑවෝලු  .
SFX 241 0 ෑවාවේ  .
SFX 241 0 ෑවදෙන්  .
SFX 241 0 ෑවාදෙන්  .
SFX 241 0 ෑවපුදෙන්  . 

SFX 242 Y 17
SFX 242 0 ැව්වා  .
SFX 242 0 ැව්වෙමි  .
SFX 242 0 ැව්වෙමු  . 
SFX 242 0 ැව්වෙහි  .
SFX 242 0 ැව්වෙහු  . 
SFX 242 0 ැව්වේය  .
SFX 242 0 ැව්වාය  .
SFX 242 0 ැව්වහ  .
SFX 242 0 ැව්වෝය  .
SFX 242 0 ැව්වාලු  .
SFX 242 0 ැව්වේලු  .
SFX 242 0 ැව්වහලු  .
SFX 242 0 ැව්වෝලු  .
SFX 242 0 ැව්වාවේ  .
SFX 242 0 ැව්වදෙන්  .
SFX 242 0 ැව්වාදෙන්  .
SFX 242 0 ැව්වපුදෙන්  . 

SFX 243 Y 38
SFX 243 0 ැවුණා .
SFX 243 0 ැවුණෙමි .
SFX 243 0 ැවුණෙමු .
SFX 243 0 ැවුණෙහි .
SFX 243 0 ැවුණෙහු .
SFX 243 0 ැවුණේය .
SFX 243 0 ැවිණ .
SFX 243 0 ැවිණි .
SFX 243 0 ැවුණි .
SFX 243 0 ැවීය . 
SFX 243 0 ැවුණාය .
SFX 243 0 ැවුණෝය .
SFX 243 0 ැවුණහ .
SFX 243 0 ැවියහ .
SFX 243 0 ැවුණාලු .
SFX 243 0 ැවුණේලු .
SFX 243 0 ැවුණහලු .
SFX 243 0 ැවුණෝලු .
SFX 243 0 ැවුණාවේ .
SFX 243 0 ැවුණදෙන් .
SFX 243 0 ැවුනා .
SFX 243 0 ැවුනෙමි .
SFX 243 0 ැවුනෙමු .
SFX 243 0 ැවුනෙහි .
SFX 243 0 ැවුනෙහු .
SFX 243 0 ැවුනේය .
SFX 243 0 ැවින .
SFX 243 0 ැවිනි .
SFX 243 0 ැවුනි .
SFX 243 0 ැවුනාය .
SFX 243 0 ැවුනහ .
SFX 243 0 ැවුනෝය .
SFX 243 0 ැවුනාලු .
SFX 243 0 ැවුනේලු .
SFX 243 0 ැවුනහලු .
SFX 243 0 ැවුනෝලු .
SFX 243 0 ැවුනාවේ .
SFX 243 0 ැවුනදෙන් .

SFX 244 Y 50
SFX 244 0 ැවෙන .
SFX 244 0 ැවෙනා .
SFX 244 0 ැවවෙන .
SFX 244 0 ැවවෙනා .
SFX 244 0 ැවූ .
SFX 244 0 ැවුණ .
SFX 244 0 ැවුණු .
SFX 244 0 ැවිච්ච .
SFX 244 0 ැවවූ .
SFX 244 0 ැවෙව්ව .
SFX 244 0 ැවවුණු .
SFX 244 0 ැවවෙව්ව .
SFX 244 0 ැවී .
SFX 244 0 ැවිලා .
SFX 244 0 ැවවී .
SFX 244 0 ැවවිලා .
SFX 244 0 ැවෙමින් .
SFX 244 0 ැවවෙමින් .
SFX 244 0 ැවෙත්ම .
SFX 244 0 ැවවෙත්ම .
SFX 244 0 ැවෙන්න .
SFX 244 0 ැවෙන්ට .
SFX 244 0 ැවෙන්නට .
SFX 244 0 ැවීමට .	
SFX 244 0 ැවවෙන්න .
SFX 244 0 ැවවෙන්ට .
SFX 244 0 ැවවෙන්නට .
SFX 244 0 ැවවීමට .	
SFX 244 0 ැවිය .
SFX 244 0 ැවවිය .
SFX 244 0 ැවෙද්දී .
SFX 244 0 ැවෙත්දී .
SFX 244 0 ැවවෙද්දී .
SFX 244 0 ැවවෙත්දී .
SFX 244 0 ැවුවොත් .
SFX 244 0 ැවුවොතින් .
SFX 244 0 ැවෙතොත් .
SFX 244 0 ැවුණොත් .
SFX 244 0 ැවුණොතින් .
SFX 244 0 ැවෙව්වොත් .
SFX 244 0 ැවෙව්වොතින් .
SFX 244 0 ැවවෙතොත් .
SFX 244 0 ැවවුණොත් .
SFX 244 0 ැවවුණොතින් .
SFX 244 0 ැවුවත් .
SFX 244 0 ැවෙතත් .
SFX 244 0 ැවුණත් .
SFX 244 0 ැවෙව්වත් .
SFX 244 0 ැවවෙතත් .
SFX 244 0 ැවවුණත් .

SFX 245 Y 11
SFX 245 0 ෑ .
SFX 245 0 ෑව .
SFX 245 0 ාපු .
SFX 245 0 ා .
SFX 245 0 ාලා .
SFX 245 0 මි .
SFX 245 0 ෑමි .
SFX 245 0 මු .
SFX 245 0 ෑ .
SFX 245 0 යි .
SFX 245 0 ති .
