API/spylls/examples/si_LK.dic
ඉඩ/234
ඉහ/234
දොළ/234
පහදා/234
පෙන්වා/234,240
බස/234
බාර/234,240
මොර/234
ලබා/234,240
ලඹ/234
වාරු/234
සවන්/234
කෙරුව/202,240
කරපු/240
කරව/200,240
කෙරව/203,240
ගේ/235
ගෙන/236
ගේන/237
බොන/237
පොවන/237
ඉන්න/238
දන්න/238
දනි/239
වනවා/240
වන්නෙමි/240
වන්නෙමු/240
වන්නෙහු/240
වන්නීය/240
වති/240
වන්න/240
වෙනවා/240
වෙන්නෙමු/240
වෙන්නෙහු/240
වෙති/240
වෙව්/240
වෙන්නේලු/240
වෙපුවාවේ/240
වේවි/240
වූමු/240
වූහු/240
වුවේය/240
වුවෝය /240
වුවහලු/240
වුණා/240
වුණෙහු/240
වුණි/240
වුණහ/240
වුණහලු/240
වුනා/240
වුනෙහු/240
වුනි/240
වුනාලු/240
වුනාවේ/240
වූවෙමු/240
වූවාය/240
වූවේලු/240
වූවදෙන්/240
වන/240
වුණ/240
වීලා/240
වත්ම/240
වෙන්න/240
වෙද්දී/240
වුණොතින්/240
ගත්/240
ගනුයේ/240
ගන්නවා/240
ගන්නෙහු/240
ගන්නෝය/240
ගනිමි/240
ගනිහ/240
ගත්තෙමි/240
ගත්තේය/240
ගත්තාලු/240
ගත්තාවේ/240
ගැනෙනවා/240
ගැනෙන්නෙමු/240
ගැනෙන්නෙහු/240
ගැනෙති/240
ගැනෙනු/240
ගැනොපන්/240
ගැනෙපල්ලා/240
ගැනෙන්නේලු/240
ගැනෙපුවාවේ/240
ගැනොවි/240
ගන්වන්නෙමි/240
ගන්වන්නෙහි/240
ගන්වන්නීය/240
ගන්වන්න/240
ගන්වාපිය/240
ගන්වපියව්/240
ගන්වනවාලා/240
ගන්වන්නෝලු/240
ගන්වපුදෙන්/240
ගැන්වෙනවා/240
ගැන්වෙන්නෙමු/240
ගැන්වෙන්නෙහු/240
ගැන්වෙති/240
ගැන්වෙනු/240
ගැන්වොපන්/240
ගැන්වෙපල්ලා/240
ගැන්වෙන්නේලු/240
ගැන්වෙපුවාවේ/240
ගැන්වොවි/240
ගැනුණෙමු/240
ගැනිණ/240
ගැනුණාය/240
ගැනුණාලු/240
ගැනුණාවේ/240
ගැනුනෙමු/240
ගැනින/240
ගැනුනහ/240
ගැනුනහලු/240
ගැන්වුණා/240
ගැන්වුණෙහු/240
ගැන්වුණි/240
ගැන්වුණහ/240
ගැන්වුණහලු/240
ගැන්වුනා/240
ගැන්වුනෙහු/240
ගැන්වුනි/240
ගැන්වුනාලු/240
ගැන්වුනාවේ/240
ගැන්නුවෙමු/240
ගැන්නුවාය/240
ගැන්නුවාලු/240
ගැන්නුවෝලු/240
ගන්වන/240
ගන්වලා/240
ගන්වත්ම/240
ගන්වන්න/240
ගන්වද්දී/240
ගන්තත්/240
ගැනවෙන/240
ගැනුණු/240
ගැනවුණු/240
ගැනවී/240
ගැනෙත්ම/240
ගැනෙන්නට/240
ගැනවෙන්නට./240
ගැනෙද්දී/240
ගැනුවොත්/240
ගැනුණොතින්/240
ගැනවුණොත්/240
ගැනුණත්/240
දෙන/240
දුන්/240
දීලා/240
දෙන්නට/240
දුන්නොත්/240
දෙන්නෙ/240
දෙනවා/240
දෙන්නෙමු/240
දෙන්නෙහු/240
දෙති/240
දෙනු/240
දොපන්/240
දෙපල්ලා/240
දෙන්නේලු/240
දෙපුවාවේ/240
දොවි/240
දෙවන්නෙමි/240
දෙවන්නෙහි/240
දෙවන්නීය/240
දෙවන්න/240
දෙවාපිය/240
දෙවපියව්/240
දෙවනවාලා/240
දෙවන්නෝලු/240
දෙවපුදෙවන්/240
දුන්නා./240
දුන්නෙහු/240
දුන්නෝය/240
දුන්නෝලු/240
දුන්නපුදෙන්/240
දෙව්වෙහි/240
දෙව්හ/240
දෙව්වේලු/240
දෙව්වාවේ/240
දාන්නෙමි/240
දාන්නෙහි/240
දාන්නීය/240
දාන්න/240
දාපන්/240
දානවාලා/240
දාන්නෝලු/240
දාවි/240
දැම්මෙන්නෙමි/240
දැම්මෙන්නෙහි/240
දැම්මෙන්නීය/240
දැම්මෙන්න/240
දැම්මොපිය/240
දැම්මෙපියව්/240
දැම්මෙනවාලා/240
දැම්මෙන්නෝලු/240
දැම්මෙපුදෙන්/240
දම්මවනවා/240
දම්මවන්නෙමු/240
දම්මවන්නෙහු/240
දම්මවති/240
දම්මවනු/240
දම්මවාපන්/240
දම්මවපල්ලා/240
දම්මවන්නේලු/240
දම්මවපුවාවේ/240
දම්මවාවි/240
දැමවෙන්නෙමි/240
දැමවෙන්නෙහි/240
දැමවෙන්නීය/240
දැමවෙන්න/240
දැමවොපිය/240
දැමවෙපියව්/240
දැමවෙනවාලා/240
දැමවෙන්නෝලු/240
දැමවෙපුදෙන්/240
දැම්මුණා/240
දැම්මුණෙහු/240
දැම්මුණි/240
දැම්මුණහ/240
දැම්මුණහලු/240
දැම්මුනා/240
දැම්මුනෙහු/240
දැම්මුනි/240
දැම්මුනාලු/240
දැම්මුනාවේ/240
දැමවුණෙමු/240
දැමවිණ/240
දැමවුණාය/240
දැමවුණාලු/240
දැමවුණාවේ/240
දැමවුනෙමු/240
දැමවින/240
දැමවුනහ/240
දැමවුනහලු/240
දැම්මා/240
දැම්මෙහු/240
දැම්මෝය/240
දැම්මෝලු./240
දැම්මපුදෙන්/240
දැම්මෙව්වෙහි/240
දැම්මෙව්හ/240
දැම්මෙව්වේලු/240
දැම්මෙව්වාවේ/240
දාපු/240
දම්මව/240
දාන්නට/240
දාන්නේ/240
යමි/240
යහි/240
යන්නේය/240
යන්නෝය/240
යපිය/240
යව්/240
යාපල්ලා/240
යතිලු/240
යාපුවාවේ/240
යේවි/240
යවනා/240
යමින්/240
යන්න/240
යවන්නට/240
යවත්දී/240
යවතත්/240
ගියෙහි/240
ගියහ/240
ගියහලු/240
ගියාදෙන්/240
යැවෙන්නෙමි/240
යැවෙන්නෙහි/240
යැවෙන්නීය/240
යැවෙන්න/240
යැවොපිය/240
යැවෙපියව්/240
යැවෙනවාලා/240
යැවෙන්නෝලු/240
යැවෙපුදෙන්/240
යැවෙන/240
යැවූ/240
යැවවූ/240
යැවී/240
යැවෙමින්/240
යැවෙන්න/240
යැවවීමට/240	
යැවෙත්දී/240
යැවුවොතින්/240
යැවෙව්වොත්/240
යැවවුණොතින්/240
යැවෙව්වත්/240
යැවුණෙමි/240
යැවුණේය/240
යැවීය/240 
යැවියහ/240
යැවුණෝලු/240
යැවුනෙමි/240
යැවුනේය/240
යැවුනාය/240
යැවුනේලු/240
යැවුනදෙන්/240
යවමු/240
යවහු/240
යවන්නාය/240
යවව/240
යවපන්/240
යවාපියව්/240
යවයිලු/240
යවද්දෙන්/240
යවාපුදෙන්/240
යැව්වෙමි/240
යැව්වේය/240
යැව්වෝය/240
යැව්වහලු/240
යැවවෙනවා/240
යැවවෙන්නෙමු/240
යැවවෙන්නෙහු/240
යැවවෙති/240
යැවවෙනු/240
යැවවොපන්/240
යැවවෙපල්ලා/240
යැවවෙන්නේලු/240
යැවවෙපුවාවේ/240
යැවවොවි/240
යැවවුණෙමු/240
යැවවිණ/240
යැවවුණාය/240
යැවවුණාලු/240
යැවවුණාවේ/240
යැවවුනෙමු/240
යැවවින/240
යැවවුනහ/240
යැවවුනහලු/240
ගියපු/240
යා/240
ක/241,242,243,244,200,204,227,245
පොදික/241,242,243,244,200,204,227,245
ල/241,200,204,227,245
සුසුම්ල/241,242,243,244,200,204,227,245
හැරල/241,242,243,244,200,204,227,245
හරිල/200,204,227,245
හකුළුවාල/200,204,227,245
දවාල/243,244,200,204,227,245
වනුයේ/240
පවතී/240
ගිය/240,271
වූයේ/240
ගත්තේ/240
ගත්තා/240
පැමිණියා/240
ලැබුණේ/240
කරන්නේ/240
